WebApplication17/ckDil/server/dictionaries/tr.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4976 N 1
SFX 4976 0 lileri .
SFX 4975 N 1
SFX 4975 0 ün .
SFX 4974 N 1
SFX 4974 0 lenebileceği .
SFX 4978 N 1
SFX 4978 0 üm .
SFX 4977 N 1
SFX 4977 0 tmalıyız .
SFX 4979 N 1
SFX 4979 0 lilere .
SFX 4980 N 1
SFX 4980 0 dama .
SFX 4982 N 1
SFX 4982 0 larındakiler .
SFX 4981 N 1
SFX 4981 0 tirdi .
SFX 4983 N 1
SFX 4983 0 mamaktır .
SFX 4984 N 1
SFX 4984 0 üz .
SFX 4986 N 1
SFX 4986 0 laşacağı .
SFX 4985 N 1
SFX 4985 0 ladıklarından .
SFX 4988 N 1
SFX 4988 0 luktur .
SFX 4987 N 1
SFX 4987 0 müşlerdi .
SFX 4990 N 1
SFX 4990 0 tmeleri .
SFX 4989 N 1
SFX 4989 0 cede .
SFX 4991 N 1
SFX 4991 0 mişlerse .
SFX 4992 N 1
SFX 4992 0 amaz .
SFX 4993 N 1
SFX 4993 0 mişler .
SFX 4994 N 1
SFX 4994 0 ebildiklerini .
SFX 4995 N 1
SFX 4995 0 üleceği .
SFX 4996 N 1
SFX 4996 0 melidirler .
SFX 4997 N 1
SFX 4997 0 leştirildiğinde .
SFX 4998 N 1
SFX 4998 0 nmasına .
SFX 4999 N 1
SFX 4999 0 lılığının .
SFX 5000 N 1
SFX 5000 0 abilmiş .
SFX 5003 N 1
SFX 5003 0 ılanı .
SFX 5002 N 1
SFX 5002 0 ılmasında .
SFX 5001 N 1
SFX 5001 0 mamdan .
SFX 5004 N 1
SFX 5004 0 uydu .
SFX 5005 N 1
SFX 5005 0 maktalar .
SFX 5006 N 1
SFX 5006 0 sızlık .
SFX 5007 N 1
SFX 5007 0 ilenin .
SFX 5008 N 1
SFX 5008 0 lanabileceklerini .
SFX 5009 N 1
SFX 5009 0 madıklarından .
SFX 5010 N 1
SFX 5010 0 larsa .
SFX 5011 N 1
SFX 5011 0 den .
SFX 5012 N 1
SFX 5012 0 leştirilip .
SFX 5013 N 1
SFX 5013 0 abildiği .
SFX 5014 N 1
SFX 5014 0 leştirilir .
SFX 5018 N 1
SFX 5018 0 min .
SFX 5017 N 1
SFX 5017 0 ebilecekleri .
SFX 5016 N 1
SFX 5016 0 lerdedir .
SFX 5015 N 1
SFX 5015 0 mekteyiz .
SFX 5019 N 1
SFX 5019 0 cıları .
SFX 5020 N 1
SFX 5020 0 lanmadığının .
SFX 5021 N 1
SFX 5021 0 nemediğinden .
SFX 5022 N 1
SFX 5022 0 daki .
SFX 5023 N 1
SFX 5023 0 miz .
SFX 5024 N 1
SFX 5024 0 sizlikle .
SFX 5025 N 1
SFX 5025 0 ecekleri .
SFX 5026 N 1
SFX 5026 0 ten .
SFX 5027 N 1
SFX 5027 0 ydim .
SFX 5029 N 1
SFX 5029 0 ndığından .
SFX 5028 N 1
SFX 5028 0 sizliklerinden .
SFX 5033 N 1
SFX 5033 0 amadıklarından .
SFX 5032 N 1
SFX 5032 0 leştirilmeli .
SFX 5031 N 1
SFX 5031 0 leştirildi .
SFX 5030 N 1
SFX 5030 0 ebilmelidir .
SFX 5034 N 1
SFX 5034 0 lüğündeki .
SFX 5037 N 1
SFX 5037 0 leştiğinin .
SFX 5036 N 1
SFX 5036 0 ıklığına .
SFX 5035 N 1
SFX 5035 0 masıysa .
SFX 5038 N 1
SFX 5038 0 mle .
SFX 5039 N 1
SFX 5039 0 ımlarındaki .
SFX 5040 N 1
SFX 5040 0 nılacak .
SFX 5041 N 1
SFX 5041 0 ınızla .
SFX 5044 N 1
SFX 5044 0 mla .
SFX 5043 N 1
SFX 5043 0 lıysa .
SFX 5042 N 1
SFX 5042 0 ilmemeli .
SFX 5045 N 1
SFX 5045 0 ememişim .
SFX 5046 N 1
SFX 5046 0 mayacaklarına .
SFX 5047 N 1
SFX 5047 0 sizliklerin .
SFX 5048 N 1
SFX 5048 0 mezler .
SFX 5049 N 1
SFX 5049 0 ımla .
SFX 5050 N 1
SFX 5050 0 lamazdı .
SFX 5051 N 1
SFX 5051 0 lığınızın .
SFX 5052 N 1
SFX 5052 0 larınını .
SFX 5053 N 1
SFX 5053 0 amaya .
SFX 5055 N 1
SFX 5055 0 amazsınız .
SFX 5054 N 1
SFX 5054 0 tmanız .
SFX 5056 N 1
SFX 5056 0 ttıklarına .
SFX 5057 N 1
SFX 5057 0 ülecek .
SFX 5059 N 1
SFX 5059 0 nmeyecek .
SFX 5058 N 1
SFX 5058 0 ttıklarından .
SFX 5060 N 1
SFX 5060 0 laştırıldığı .
SFX 5061 N 1
SFX 5061 0 lüsü .
SFX 5064 N 1
SFX 5064 0 tmanın .
SFX 5063 N 1
SFX 5063 0 ulacağına .
SFX 5062 N 1
SFX 5062 0 ememişiz .
SFX 5065 N 1
SFX 5065 0 yebileceği .
SFX 5066 N 1
SFX 5066 0 yenin .
SFX 5067 N 1
SFX 5067 0 yanın .
SFX 5068 N 1
SFX 5068 0 ıyorsanız .
SFX 5070 N 1
SFX 5070 0 laşırken .
SFX 5069 N 1
SFX 5069 0 liğimizle .
SFX 5071 N 1
SFX 5071 0 düğü .
SFX 5072 N 1
SFX 5072 0 yamama .
SFX 5073 N 1
SFX 5073 0 dim .
SFX 5074 N 1
SFX 5074 0 din .
SFX 5075 N 1
SFX 5075 0 uşu .
SFX 5077 N 1
SFX 5077 0 dir .
SFX 5076 N 1
SFX 5076 0 ımdı .
SFX 5078 N 1
SFX 5078 0 leştirilen .
SFX 5079 N 1
SFX 5079 0 leştirilmediği .
SFX 5080 N 1
SFX 5080 0 selliği .
SFX 5082 N 1
SFX 5082 0 leştirdiğini .
SFX 5081 N 1
SFX 5081 0 ıcılarını .
SFX 5083 N 1
SFX 5083 0 dik .
SFX 5084 N 1
SFX 5084 0 meyle .
SFX 5085 N 1
SFX 5085 0 luklarla .
SFX 5086 N 1
SFX 5086 0 'siyle .
SFX 5088 N 1
SFX 5088 0 ışları .
SFX 5087 N 1
SFX 5087 0 lemedi .
SFX 5089 N 1
SFX 5089 0 amayız .
SFX 5090 N 1
SFX 5090 0 lanışına .
SFX 5091 N 1
SFX 5091 0 lemede .
SFX 5092 N 1
SFX 5092 0 amayıp .
SFX 5093 N 1
SFX 5093 0 lanabileceğinin .
SFX 5094 N 1
SFX 5094 0 uşa .
SFX 5096 N 1
SFX 5096 0 mamasına .
SFX 5095 N 1
SFX 5095 0 nmasıdır .
SFX 5097 N 1
SFX 5097 0 'sını .
SFX 5098 N 1
SFX 5098 0 lenemiyor .
SFX 5099 N 1
SFX 5099 0 eceği .
